Utah statutes.
73-2-27.   Criminal penalties.

(1)  This section applies to offenses committed under:

(a)  Section 73-1-14;

(b)  Section 73-1-15;

(c)  Section 73-2-20;

(d)  Subsection 73-3-3(9);

(e)  Section 73-3-26;

(f)  Section 73-3-29;

(g)  Section 73-5-9;

(h)  Section 76-10-201;

(i)  Section 76-10-202; and

(j)  Section 76-10-203.

(2)  Under circumstances not amounting to an offense with a greater penalty under Subsection 76-6-106(2)(b)(ii) or Section 76-6-404, violation of a provision listed in Subsection (1) is punishable:

(a)  as a felony of the third degree if:

(i)  the value of the water diverted or property damaged or taken is $2,500 or greater; and

(ii)  the person violating the provision has previously been convicted of violating the same provision;

(b)  as a class A misdemeanor if:

(i)  the value of the water diverted or property damaged or taken is $2,500 or greater; or

(ii)  the person violating the provision has previously been convicted of violating the same provision; or

(c)  as a class B misdemeanor if Subsection (2)(a) or (b) does not apply.

